Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of sections 49 to 59,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “housing for older persons” has the  meaning
given that term in ORS 659A.421.
(2) In addition to any lands added to a city’s urban growth  boundary under any other
provision of ORS chapter 197A, including other provisions  of sections 49 to 59, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024, a city or Metro may add a site for  housing for older persons or manu-
factured dwellings, prefabricated structures or  manufactured dwelling parks, including ex-
isting units or parks, to its urban growth boundary under this section.
(3) The total acreage of the site:
(a) For a city with a population of 25,000 or greater, may not exceed 100  net residential
acres; or
(b) For a city with a  population of less than 25,000, may not exceed 50 net residential
acres.
(4)(a) Within 120 days of receiving a petition under this section,  Metro shall determine
whether the site would substantially comply with the applicable provisions of sections 49 to
59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(b) If Metro determines that a petition does not substantially comply, Metro shall:
(A) Notify the city of deficiencies in the petition, specifying sufficient detail  to allow the
city to remedy any deficiency in a subsequent resubmittal; and
(B) Allow the  city to amend its conceptual plan and resubmit it as a petition to Metro
under this section.
(c) If Metro determines  that a petition does comply, notwithstanding any other provision
of ORS chapter 197A,  Metro shall adopt amendments to its urban growth boundary to include
the site in the petition, unless the amendment would result in  more than 300 total net resi-
dential acres added under this subsection.
(d) Metro may not conduct  a hearing to review or select petitions or adopt amendments
to its urban growth boundary under this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 1
(e) Sites added to the Metro urban growth boundary under this section do not  affect the
maximum acreage of sites that may be added under section 51 (3) or (4), chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024.
(5) A city that adds or petitions to add a site under this section:
(a) Is not required to demonstrate need for housing lands or affordable housing  under
section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(b) May additionally add a site to its urban growth boundary under section  50 (1) or 56,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, or section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025,  or may petition
to add a site under section 51, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(c) Must first adopt a conceptual plan as described in section  55, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024, except that the conceptual plan:
(A) Is not required to establish the density or housing types under  section 55 (3)(a),
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, for lands that will  be sited for manufactured dwellings, pre-
fabricated structures or manufactured dwelling parks.
(B) May be zoned for residential densities of  eight units per net residential acre in a city
with a population of  30,000 or greater, notwithstanding section 55 (3)(a)(C)(i) or (ii), chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(C) Is not required to comply with section 55 (3)(f), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(D) Must include requirements  that ensure that at least 80 percent of dwelling units, not
including manufactured dwellings or prefabricated  structures, are subject to affordability
restrictions, including but not limited to affordable housing covenants, as described  in ORS
456.270 to 456.295, that require for a period of not less than 30 years that the units be avail-
able and affordable, with or without government assistance, for rent or purchase by house-
holds with an income of 120 percent of the area median income or less.
(E) Must require that all land  within the housing development, other than land in a
manufactured dwelling park or used for  manufactured dwellings or prefabricated structures,
is designated as housing for older persons.  This requirement may take the form of zoning
designations or overlays,  master planning, conditions of approval, restrictive covenants or
declarations as defined in ORS 94.550 or 100.005, that:
(i) Require the owner  of the land to develop a plan to use the land only as housing for
older persons. The plan must include policies  and procedures as described in 24 C.F.R.
100.306;
(ii) Are enforceable by the city;
(iii) Contain financial penalties for noncompliance; and
(iv) Require that at least 80 percent of the residential units  comply with the “Type B”
requirements applicable to  units as set forth in the Standard for Accessible and Usable
Buildings and Facilities published by the International Code Council and as referenced  by the
state building code.
(F) Must require that lands not be rezoned following the site’s  inclusion within the urban
growth boundary for a period of:
(i) Thirty years for manufactured dwelling parks; or
(ii) Twenty years for manufactured dwellings or prefabricated structures.
SECTION 2a.
 If House Bill 4035 becomes law, section 2 of this 2026 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used  in this section, “housing for older persons” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 659A.421.
(2) In addition to any lands added to a city’s urban growth boundary  under any other provision
of ORS chapter 197A, including other provisions of sections 49  to 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws
2024, a city or Metro may add a site for  housing for older persons or manufactured dwellings, pre-
fabricated structures or  manufactured dwelling parks, including existing units or parks, to its urban
growth boundary under this section.
(3) The total acreage of the site:
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 2
(a) For a city with a population  of 25,000 or greater, may not exceed 100 net [ residential]
buildable acres; or
(b) For a city with a population  of less than 25,000, may not exceed 50 net [ residential] buildable
acres.
(4)(a) Within 120 days of receiving a petition under this  section, Metro shall determine whether
the site would substantially comply with the applicable provisions of sections 49  to 59, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024.
(b) If Metro determines that a petition does not substantially comply, Metro shall:
(A) Notify the city of deficiencies in the petition, specifying sufficient detail to allow the  city
to remedy any deficiency in a subsequent resubmittal; and
(B) Allow the  city to amend its conceptual plan and resubmit it as a petition to Metro under
this section.
(c) If Metro determines that a petition does comply, notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS
chapter 197A, Metro  shall adopt amendments to its urban growth boundary to include the site in
the petition, unless  the amendment would result in more than 300 total net [ residential] buildable
acres added under this subsection.
(d) Metro  may not conduct a hearing to review or select petitions or adopt amendments to its
urban growth boundary under this section.
(e) Sites added to the Metro  urban growth boundary under this section do not affect the maxi-
mum acreage of sites that may  be added under section 51 (3) or (4), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(5) A city that adds or petitions to add a site under this section:
(a) Is not required to demonstrate need for housing lands or affordable housing under section
52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(b) May  additionally add a site to its urban growth boundary under section 50 (1) or 56, chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024, or section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, or  may petition to add a site
under section 51, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(c) Must first adopt a conceptual plan  as described in section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws
2024, except that the conceptual plan:
(A) Is not required to establish the density or housing types under section 55  (3)(a), chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024, for lands that will be sited for manufactured dwellings, prefabricated structures
or manufactured dwelling parks.
(B) May be zoned for residential densities of eight units per net [ residential] buildable acre in
a city with a population of 30,000 or greater, notwithstanding section 55 (3)(a)(C)(i) or (ii), chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(C) Is not required to comply with section 55 (3)(f), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(D) Must include requirements that ensure that at least 80 percent of dwelling units, not  in-
cluding manufactured dwellings or prefabricated structures, are subject  to affordability restrictions,
including but not limited to affordable housing covenants, as described in ORS  456.270 to 456.295,
that require for a period of not less than 30 years that the units be available and affordable,  with
or without government assistance, for rent or  purchase by households with an income of 120 percent
of the area median income or less.
(E) Must require that all land within the housing development, other than land in  a manufac-
tured dwelling park or used for manufactured dwellings  or prefabricated structures, is designated
as housing for older  persons. This requirement may take the form of zoning designations or overlays,
master planning, conditions  of approval, restrictive covenants or declarations as defined in ORS
94.550 or 100.005, that:
(i) Require the  owner of the land to develop a plan to use the land only as housing for older
persons. The plan must include policies and procedures as described in 24 C.F.R. 100.306;
(ii) Are enforceable by the city;
(iii) Contain financial penalties for noncompliance; and
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 3
(iv) Require that at least  80 percent of the residential units comply with the “Type B” require-
ments applicable to units as  set forth in the Standard for Accessible and Usable Buildings and Fa-
cilities published by the International Code Council and as referenced by the state building code.
(F) Must require that lands not be rezoned following the site’s inclusion within the urban growth
boundary for a period of:
(i) Thirty years for manufactured dwelling parks; or
(ii) Twenty years for manufactured dwellings or prefabricated structures.
SECTION 3.
 Section 57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended  by section 3, chapter 341,
Oregon Laws 2025, and section 7, chapter 530, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 57.  (1) Within 21 days after the  adoption of an amendment to an urban growth boundary
or the adoption or amendment of a conceptual plan under sections  49 to 59, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024, and  the approval by a county if required under section 50 (2), chapter 110, Oregon Laws
2024, the conceptual plan or amendment must be submitted to the Department of  Land Conservation
and Development for review. The submission must be made by:
(a) The city, for an amendment under section 50 or  58, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, [ or]
section 2 , chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, or section 2 of this 2026 Act  [ of this 2025 Act ]; or
(b) Metro, for an amendment under section 51 or 58, chapter 110, Oregon  Laws 2024 , or section
2 of this 2026 Act .
(2) Within 60  days after receiving a submittal under subsection (1) of this section, the depart-
ment shall:
(a) Review the submittal for compliance with the provisions of sections 49 to 59, chapter  110,
Oregon Laws 2024.
(b)(A) If the submittal substantially complies with the provisions of sections 49 to 59,  chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024, issue an order approving the submittal; or
(B) If the  submittal does not substantially comply with the provisions of sections 49 to 59,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, issue an order remanding the submittal to  the city or to Metro with
a specific determination of deficiencies in the submittal  and with sufficient detail to identify a spe-
cific remedy for any deficiency in a subsequent resubmittal.
(3) If a conceptual plan is remanded to Metro under subsection (2)(b) of this section:
(a) The department shall notify the city; and
(b) The city may amend its conceptual  plan and resubmit a petition to Metro under section 51,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(4) Judicial review of the department’s order:
(a) Must be as a review of orders other than a contested case under ORS 183.484; and
(b) May be initiated only by the city or an owner  of a proposed site that was submitted to the
department.
(5) Following the approval of a submittal under this section, a local government must include
the added  lands in any future inventory of buildable lands or determination of housing capacity
under ORS 197A.270, 197A.280, 197A.335 or 197A.350.
SECTION 4.
 Section 60, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended  by section 4, chapter 341,
Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 60. (1) Section 49, chapter 110, Oregon  Laws 2024, as amended by section 4, chapter
530, Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
[(1)] (2)  Sections [ 49 to 56, 58 ] 50, 51, 53, 54, 56  and 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, are
repealed on January 2, 2033.
(3) Section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 5,  chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(4) Section 55,  chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6, chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
[(2)] (5)  Section 57, chapter 110, Oregon  Laws 2024, as amended by section 3 [ of this 2025 Act ],
chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, section 7, chapter  530, Oregon Laws 2025, and section 3 of
this 2026 Act,  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 4
(6) Section 58, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 8,  chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
[(3)] (7)  Section 2 , chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025,  [ of this 2025 Act ] is repealed on January
2, 2033.
(8) Section 2 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2033.
SECTION 4a.
If House Bill 4035 becomes law, section 4  of this 2026 Act (amending section
60, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024) is repealed and section  60, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024,
as amended by section 4,  chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, and section 12, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035), is amended to read:
Sec. 60.  (1) Section 49, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 4,  chapter 530,
Oregon Laws 2025, and section 1 [ of this 2026 Act ], chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2026 (Enrolled
House Bill 4035), is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(2) Section  50, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 2 [ of this 2026 Act ],
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(3) Section 51, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 3 [ of this 2026  Act ],
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(4) Section 52, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 5, chapter 530,  Oregon
Laws 2025, and section 4 [ of this 2026 Act ], chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill
4035), is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(5) Section  53, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 5 [ of this 2026 Act ],
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(6) Section 54, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6 [ of this 2026  Act ],
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(7) Section 55, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6, chapter 530,  Oregon
Laws 2025, and section 7 [ of this 2026 Act ], chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill
4035), is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(8) Section  56, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 8 [ of this 2026 Act ],
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(9) Section  57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 3, chapter 341, Oregon
Laws 2025, [ and] section 7, chapter 530, Oregon  Laws 2025, and section 3 of this 2026 Act,  is re-
pealed on January 2, 2033.
(10) Section 58, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 8, chapter 530, Oregon
Laws 2025, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(11) Section 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(12) Section  2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2025, as amended by section 9 [ of this 2026 Act ],
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),  is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(13) Section 11 [ of this 2026 Act ], chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4035),
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(14) Section 2 of this 2026 Act, as amended  by section 2a of this 2026 Act, is repealed on
January 2, 2033.
SECTION 5.
This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 5
Passed by House February 17, 2026
Repassed by House March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4082 (HB 4082-B) Page 6